Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1039.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1301-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 1301-A. Definitions.--As used in this article,* * *"Department" shall mean the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Nonpublic school" shall mean any school, other than a public school within this Commonwealth, wherein a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school 123456789101112131415161718192021 attendance requirements of this act and which meets the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 78 Stat. 241).* * *"School-wide staff" shall mean any individual within the control of, or acting on behalf of, the district, including:(1) district employes;(2) after-school providers;(3) contractors;(4) consultants;(5) volunteers;(6) vendors;(7) school security personnel;(8) school resource officers as defined in section 1301-C; and(9) service providers.* * *Section 2. Section 1302-A(b)(3) of the act is amended and subsection (b)(1) is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:Section 1302-A. Student Supports.--* * *(b) The Department of Education shall have the power and duty to implement the following:(1) To collect, develop and disseminate information, policies, strategies and other information to assist in the development of programs that support students, reduce unnecessary student disciplinary actions and promote an environment of greater productivity, safety and learning, including, but not limited to:* * *(viii.1) School-wide staff training programs conducted by a 20250SB1039PN1237 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certified trainer to recognize and respond appropriately to indicators of mental distress and suicidal ideation in students. The training program shall be offered to school entities and nonpublic schools no less than two times throughout a school year. No fee may be assessed for participation in the training program implemented under this subparagraph.* * *(3) To assist in collaboration and coordination with the School Safety and Security Committee established under section 1302-B and school entities and nonpublic schools on the development of policies to be used regarding:(i) possession of weapons by any person, acts of violence and protocols for coordination with and reporting to law enforcement officials and the Department of Education[.]; and(ii) training programs implemented under paragraph (1)(viii.1) for school-wide staff. The policies developed under this subparagraph shall include, at a minimum, the policy requirements for the Pennsylvania Mental Health First Aid Training Program established under section 1303.2-A(a). A school entity or nonpublic school shall not be required to provide a training program or to adopt related policies if the school entity or nonpublic school does not provide school-wide staff training.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1303.2-A. Pennsylvania Mental Health First Aid Training Program.-- (a) The Pennsylvania Mental Health First Aid Training Program is established for the purpose of providing student supports and guidance to school entities and nonpublic schools in identifying student mental health struggles and 20250SB1039PN1237 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deterioration in accordance with this section.(b) (1) A school entity or nonpublic school is not required to offer student supports that include staff participation in a school-wide staff training program. For a school entity or nonpublic school that offers student supports that include staff participation in a school-wide staff training program that was implemented:(i) by the department under section 1302-A(b)(1)(viii.1), the school entity or nonpublic school shall adopt or amend existing policy in accordance with section 1302-A(b)(3)(ii); or(ii) by the school entity or the nonpublic school under this section, the school entity or nonpublic school shall adopt or amend existing policy in accordance with this section.(2) No later than January 1, 2026, the department shall develop a model policy pursuant to section 1302-A(b)(3)(ii) on which a school entity or nonpublic school may model an existing policy relating to a training program to be conducted by a certified trainer for school-wide staff. The policy must include:(i) Training to r ecognize indicators of student mental distress.(ii) Training to r ecognize mental health decline and mental struggle in students.(iii) Training to l earn appropriate responses and intervention techniques to use when a student displays an indicator of mental distress, mental health decline or mental health struggles.(iv) Provid ing up-to-date contact information for student self-care programs or mental health programs.(v) A ny other school-wide staff skill development or 20250SB1039PN1237 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information that the school entity or nonpublic school deems necessary to address student suicide awareness and educator and staff preparedness.(3) The policy amended or adopted under paragraph (1) shall identify:(i) The school-wide staff eligible for training under the program.(ii) T he appropriate school staff person to receive reports of incidents of student mental health concerns. An incident report shall include the student mental health concern of the staff person making the report and the course of action advised to the student.(iii) A process for submission of documented certification of each school-wide staff completing the training to the appropriate school staff person and a retention process that includes requirements for removal of expired certification and any renewal of certification requirements.(iv) A process to notify school-wide staff of the availability of training conducted by a certified trainer. Training shall be provided by the school entity or nonpublic school at least two times each school year.(4) Each school entity and nonpublic school shall review the policy amended or adopted under paragraph (1) every three (3) years and annually provide the department with a copy of the policy relating to student mental health, which shall also include:(i) Information related to the development and implementation of any student mental health distress prevention, intervention and education program.(ii) Data of incidents, with identifying information 20250SB1039PN1237 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 redacted, of mental health concerns reported to the designated school staff person under the school entity or nonpublic school's policy.(c) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, and each school year thereafter, each school entity that offers a training program conducted by a certified trainer for school- wide staff to recognize and respond appropriately to indicators of mental distress and suicidal ideation in students may include the training in the continuing education plan submitted by the school entity to the department for approval pursuant to section 1205.1 for no more than four (4) hours of training, every five (5) years.(d) Each school entity and nonpublic school shall make the policy adopted or amended under this section available on the publicly accessible Internet website of the school entity or nonpublic school, if available, and in every classroom. Each school entity shall post the policy at a prominent location within each school building where notices are usually posted. Each school entity shall ensure that the policy and procedures for reporting bullying incidents are reviewed with students within ninety (90) days after adoption and at least once each school year thereafter.Section 4. Section 1306-B(j) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1306-B. School Safety and Security Grant Program.* * *(j) Specific purposes.--The committee shall provide grants to school entities for programs that address school mental health and safety and security, including:* * *20250SB1039PN1237 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (17.1) Staff training programs conducted by a certified trainer to recognize and respond appropriately to indicators of mental distress and suicidal ideation in students, including costs associated with participation in a training program implemented by the d epartment under section 1302-A(b) (1)(viii.1) for school-wide staff training or incurred by a school entity or nonpublic school that implements a policy under section 1303.2-A.* * *Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1039PN1237 - 7 - 12345678910